District of Columbia statutes.
36-301.21

Security requirements for retail service stations.

(a)

The operator of a retail service station shall install video surveillance equipment to monitor all pumps at the retail service station within 6 months after October 22, 2009. The Metropolitan Police Department shall review the surveillance video in the event of a crime committed at the station.

(b)

(1)

The operator of a retail service station shall display a warning sign at each pump and at the attendant’s duty station that warns:

(A)

Always remove the keys from a vehicle;

(B)

Lock all doors when exiting a vehicle; and

(C)

Premises under surveillance.

(2)

The measurements for each sign shall exceed 8 inches by 8 inches.

(3)

The text for each sign shall be in boldface and shall exceed a 36-point font.

(4)

The text and background for each sign shall be in contrasting colors.

Apr. 19, 1977 D.C. Law 1-123, § 3-121
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-65, § 2, 56 DCR 6606
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 27, 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 36-302.21.
2001 Ed., §  36-302.21.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated subchapter II-A of this chapter as subchapter I-A; and renumbered former § 36-302.21 as § 36-301.21.